Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256R.481, is amended to read: 256R.481 RATE ADJUSTMENTS FOR BORDER CITY FACILITIES. (a) The commissioner shall allow each nonprofit nursing facility located within the boundaries of the city of Breckenridge or Moorhead prior to January 1, 2015, to apply once annually for a rate add-on to the facility's external fixed costs payment rate. (b) A facility seeking an add-on to its external fixed costs payment rate under this section must apply annually to the commissioner to receive the add-on. A facility must submit the application within 60 calendar days of the effective date of any add-on under this section. The commissioner may waive the deadlines required by this paragraph under extraordinary circumstances. (c) The commissioner shall provide the add-on to each eligible facility that applies by the application deadline. (d) The add-on to the external fixed costs payment rate is the difference on January 1 of the median total payment rate for deleted text begin case mix classification PA1deleted text end new text begin the lowest case mix classification in effectnew text end of the nonprofit facilities located in an adjacent city in another state and in cities contiguous to the adjacent city minus the eligible nursing facility's total payment rate for deleted text begin case mix classification PA1deleted text end new text begin the lowest case mix classification in effectnew text end as determined under section 256R.22, subdivision 4. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from January 1, 2026, and applies to rate years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. new text end